California statutes. Financial Code
 its terms, at the monthly rate stated in the contract, may be precomputed when the loan is made and added to the principal of the loan. For the purpose of computation, a month shall be that period of time from any date in one month to the corresponding date in the next month, and if there is no corresponding date, then to the last day of the next month. The principal amount of the loan shall be its face value as referred to in Section 22309. Every payment may be applied to the combined total of principal and precomputed charges until the contract is fully paid. The acceptance of payment of charges on loans made under the provisions of this article shall not be deemed to constitute payment deduction or receipt thereof in advance nor compounding under Section 22309. Precomputed charges shall be subject to the following adjustments:

(1) The portion of the precomputed charge applicable to any particular monthly installment period shall bear the
 same ratio to the total precomputed charge, excluding any adjustment made for a first period of more than one month, as the balance scheduled to be outstanding during that monthly period bears to the sum of all monthly balances scheduled originally by the loan contract.

(2) If the loan contract is paid in full by cash, a new loan, refinancing, or otherwise, the borrower shall receive a rebate of that portion of the precomputed charge that is the difference between the total precomputed charge and the charges at the contract rate computed in accordance with the provisions of Section 22307 or 22308. The tender, by the borrower or at his or her request, of an amount equal to the unpaid balance, less the required rebate, must be accepted by the licensee in full payment of the contract.

(3) If three or more, but not all, installments are prepaid in full at any one time, all of the
 prior charges for the loan shall be recalculated and all subsequent charges for the remaining term of the loan shall be recalculated by applying each payment first to charges and the remainder to principal in accordance with the provisions of Section 22307 or 22308.

(4) If the payment date of all wholly unpaid installments on which no default charge has been collected is deferred one or more full months and the contract so provides, the licensee may charge and collect a deferment charge. The deferment charge shall not exceed the portion of the precomputed charge applicable prior to deferment, to the first deferred monthly installment period multiplied by the number of months the maturity of the contract is deferred. The number of months shall not exceed the number of full installments that are in default on the date of deferment or that may become due within 15 days of that date. When a deferment charge is made, no portion of the precomputed
 charge shall apply to the installment periods in which no installment payment is required by reason of the deferment. In computing any default charge or required rebate, the portion of the precomputed charge applicable to each deferred balance and installment period following the deferment period and prior to the deferred maturity shall remain the same as that applicable to the balances and periods under the original loan contract. The charge may be collected at the time of deferment or at any time thereafter. Any payment received at the time of deferment may be applied first to the deferment charge and the remainder, if any, applied to the unpaid balance of the contract. However, if the payment is sufficient to pay, in addition to the appropriate deferment charge, any installment that is in default and the applicable default charge, it shall be first so applied and any such installment shall not be deferred nor subject to the deferment charge.

(5) In the event of default of more than 10 days in the payment of one-half or more of any scheduled installment, the licensee may charge and collect a default charge not exceeding an amount equal to the portion of the precomputed charge applicable to the final installment period. The charge may not be collected more than once for the same default and may be collected at the time of the default or at any time thereafter. If the default charge is deducted from any payment received after default occurs, and the deduction results in the default of a subsequent installment, no charge may be made for the resulting default.

(6) A borrower and licensee may agree that the first installment due date may be not more than 15 days more than one month and the amount of the installment may be increased by one-thirtieth of the portion of the precomputed charge applicable to a first installment of one month for each extra day.

(b) The statement to be given to the borrower as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 22337 and the contract shall disclose in addition to other required information the principal amount of the loan exclusive of charges and the basis for computing the refund of precomputed charges in case of prepayment in full or acceleration of maturity and for computing default and deferment charges. The delivery of a receipt of each payment showing the total amount of each payment complies with subdivision (d) of Section 22337.

(c) If the maturity of the contract when the charges are precomputed is accelerated for any reason, the licensee shall make the same refund or credit as would be required if the contract was paid in full on the date of acceleration. The unpaid balance shall be treated as the unpaid principal balance, and thereafter the unpaid balance of the contract shall bear charges at
 the agreed rate of charge if the loan contract so provides.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22401.

With respect to precomputed loans, licensees shall be subject only to, comply only with, and derive authority only from Sections 22400 and 22402, notwithstanding any other provision of law that is not within this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22402.

When charges on a loan of an original bona fide principal amount of five thousand ($5,000) or more have been precomputed in a manner similar to that provided in Section 22400, and the loan is prepaid in full by cash, a new loan, refinancing, or otherwise, or the maturity of the loan contract is accelerated for any reason, the borrower shall receive a rebate or credit of that portion of the precomputed charge that is the difference between the total precomputed charge and the charges at the contract rate computed in accordance with the provisions of Section 22307
 or 22308, or on the basis of 12 equal months of 30 days each, on the assumption that all payments were received by the licensee on their respective due dates. This section does not apply to charges paid by the borrower to the lender or others, such as charges computed as a percentage of the loan, that are fully earned upon making the loan, or to charges agreed to be paid by the borrower upon prepayment of a loan secured by a lien upon real property.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Open-End Loan Programs [22450. - 22467.]

22450.

As used in this division, “open-end credit program” means a licensee’s plan for making open-end loans pursuant to a loan agreement that sets forth the terms and conditions governing the use of the open-end credit program, expressly states that the loan is made pursuant to this article, and provides that:

(a) The borrower may use the open-end credit program to obtain money, goods, labor, or services on credit. The licensee makes open-end loans to the borrower for the purpose of paying money to or at
 the direction of the borrower or paying obligations that the borrower creates through use of the open-end credit program.

(b) The amount of each advance and the charges and other permitted costs are debited to an account.

(c) The charges are computed from time to time on the unpaid balances of the borrower’s account, excluding from the computation any unpaid charges other than permitted fees, costs, and expenses.

(d) The borrower has the privilege of paying the account in full at any time.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22451.

If an open-end credit program is not primarily for the purpose of purchasing or leasing goods or services from the licensee, then all credit extended through use of the program, including transactions that involve the purchase or lease of goods or services from the licensee, shall be subject to this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22452.

Subject to the written approval of the commissioner of the licensee’s plan of business for making open-end loans as not being misleading or deceptive and subject to regulations the commissioner may adopt with respect to open-end loans under Section 22150, a licensee may make open-end loans pursuant to this article and may contract for and receive thereon charges as set forth in Sections 22303, 22304, 22304.5, and 22308. These charges may be calculated on an amount not exceeding the greater of:

(a) The actual daily unpaid balances of the open-end account in the billing cycle for which the charge is made, in which case one-thirtieth of the monthly rate may be charged for each day the unpaid balance is outstanding.

(b) The average daily unpaid balance of the open-end account in the billing cycle for which the charge is made, which is the sum of the amount unpaid each day during that cycle divided by the number of days in that cycle. The amount unpaid on a day is determined by adding to any balance unpaid as of the beginning of that day all advances and other debits and deducting all payments and other credits made or received as of that day. The billing cycle shall be monthly. A billing cycle is monthly if the closing date of the cycle is the same date each month or does not vary by more than four days from the regular date.

This section does not apply to any open-end loan of a bona fide principal amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more as determined in accordance with Section 22467.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 708, Sec. 9.   (AB 539)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22453.

The minimum monthly payment shall be determined by any of the following:

(a) The amount calculated by multiplying the unpaid principal balance, after an advance and including the advance, by a percent agreed upon by the borrower and the licensee, which shall be no less than 212 percent. The minimum payment shall continue at the amount determined pursuant to this paragraph until a subsequent loan advance is made.

(b) The amount calculated by multiplying the unpaid balance at the end of each billing cycle by a percent agreed upon by the borrower and the licensee, which shall be no less
 than 5 percent.

(c) Any other bona fide amount agreed upon by the borrower and the licensee which would be sufficient to pay all charges and some principal, originally scheduled to be due by the borrower as of each scheduled due date.

This section does not apply to any open-end loan of a bona fide principal amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more as determined in accordance with Section 22467.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 708, Sec. 10.   (AB 539)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22454.

On open-end loans, the licensee may contract for and receive the fees, costs, and expenses permitted on other loans, including those permitted by subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d) of Section 22313 and subdivision (d) of Section 22314, except that the charge for credit insurance under Section 22314 shall be on a monthly basis and shall be actuarially consistent with the premium rate for the same coverage.

This section does not apply to any open-end loan of a bona fide principal amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more as determined in accordance with Section 22467.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 708, Sec. 11.   (AB 539)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22455.

(a) In lieu of subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of Section 22314, with respect to open-end loans, a licensee may provide credit insurance with the borrower’s consent, in a form to be approved by the Insurance Commissioner, in an amount not in excess of the amount of the indebtedness. For credit life or disability insurance, the licensee may collect from the borrower an amount established pursuant to Section 779.36 of the Insurance Code.

(b) If life insurance is
 provided, and if the insured borrower dies during the term of the loan contract, the insurance shall be sufficient to pay the total amount due on the loan outstanding on the date of his or her death, without any exception, reservation, or limitation.

(c) If disability insurance is provided, and if the insured borrower becomes disabled during the term of the loan contract, the insurance shall be sufficient to pay all amounts attributable to the loan balance at the time of commencement of disability that subsequently become due on the loan thereafter during the period of disability, in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 22315, without any exception, reservation, or limitation.

(d) If loss-of-income insurance is provided, and if the insured borrower becomes unemployed during the term of the loan contract, the insurance shall be sufficient to pay all amounts attributable to
 the loan balance at the time of commencement of unemployment in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 22321 without any exception, reservation, or limitation.

(e) Any credit insurance that is provided shall be in force as soon as the loan is made or coverage is agreed upon, whichever is later. No credit insurance written in connection with an open-end loan shall be canceled by the lender because of delinquency of the borrower in the making of the minimum payments thereon unless one or more of the payments is past due for a period of 90 days or more, and the lender shall advance to the insurer the amounts required to keep the insurance in force during that period, which amounts may be debited to the borrower’s account.

This section does not apply to any open-end loan of a bona fide principal amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more as determined in accordance with Section
 22467.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22456.

Section 22309 shall apply to open-end loans with the following variations:

(a) To comply with Section 22309, in the case of open-end loan advances directly to the borrower, the licensee shall deliver to the borrower, at the time of each loan advance, an amount equal to the face value of the advance.

(b) To comply with Section 22309, in the case of an open-end loan advance in the form of a payment by the licensee to a person from whom a borrower obtained money, goods, labor, or services, the licensee shall deliver to that person the amounts necessary to fulfill the borrower’s obligation to that person under the transaction.

This section does
 not apply to any open-end loan of a bona fide principal amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more as determined in accordance with Section 22467.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 708, Sec. 12.   (AB 539)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22457.

In lieu of Section 22332, the open-end loan agreement shall contain the name, address, and license number of the finance lender and shall disclose the nature of the security taken, the method of determining the minimum payments that will be required to repay the initial advance and any subsequent advances on the loan, and the agreed rate of charge.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22458.

In lieu of subdivision (a) of Section 22337, with respect to open-end loans, except in the case of an account that the licensee deems to be uncollectible, or for which delinquency collection procedures have been instituted, the licensee shall deliver or cause to be delivered to the borrower, or any one thereof, for each billing cycle at the end of which there is an outstanding balance in the account, or to which a finance charge is imposed, a statement setting forth the outstanding balance in the account at the beginning of the billing cycle, the date and amount
 of any subsequent loan advance during the period, the amounts and dates of crediting to the account during the billing cycle that payments are credited, the amount of any finance charge debited to the account during the billing cycle, the annual percentage rate of finance charge determined under Regulation Z promulgated by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (12 C.F.R. 226), the balance on which the finance charge was computed, the closing date of the billing cycle, the outstanding balance on that date, and the minimum monthly payment required in the absence of any additional advance. If there has been any change in the nature of the security for the loan since the next preceding advance, the statement shall contain or be accompanied by a statement of the nature of the security for the loan after that change.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22459.

Subdivision (e) of Section 22337 shall not apply to an open-end loan that has no balance outstanding if the open-end loan agreement continues in effect.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22460.

Section 22333 shall not apply to a change in terms of an open-end loan if notice is given to the borrower in accordance with subsection (c) of Section 226.9 of Regulation Z promulgated by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (12 C.F.R. 226).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22461.

Subdivision (a) of Section 22151, Sections 22154 and 22325, and subdivision (b) of Section 22337 shall not apply to a licensee with respect to advances made through an open-end credit program.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22462.

The payment of fees for participation in an open-end credit program, the acceptance by a borrower of the form of the licensee’s program, and the borrower’s agreement to the licensee’s program shall not be deemed to be a collateral sale, purchase, or agreement within the terms of Section 22201, 22311, or 22312.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22463.

Nothing in this article limits the authority of the commissioner to disapprove advertising with respect to open-end loans pursuant to Section 22165.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 708, Sec. 13.   (AB 539)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22464.

This article does not apply to loans other than open-end loans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 708, Sec. 14.   (AB 539)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22465.

Section 22400 does not apply to open-end loans.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22466.

An open-end loan is in compliance with Section 22330 if it is an open-end loan of a bona fide principal amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more as determined in accordance with Section 22467.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22467.

(a) Any section that refers to this section or that is subject to Section 22251 does not apply to any open-end loan of the bona fide principal amount specified in the regulatory ceiling provision of that section or more, or to a duly licensed finance lender in connection with any such loan if that provision is not used for the purpose of evading this division.

(b) In determining whether an open-end loan is an open-end loan of a bona fide principal amount specified in any
 section in this division or more and whether the regulatory ceiling provision of that section is used for the purpose of evading this division, the open-end loan shall be deemed to be for that amount or more if both the following criteria are met:

(1) The line of credit is equal to or more than the bona fide principal amount of the specified amount.

(2) The initial advance was equal to or more than the bona fide principal amount of the specified amount.

(c) A subsequent advance of money of less than the specified amount pursuant to the open-end loan agreement between a borrower and a licensed finance lender shall be deemed to be a loan of a bona fide principal amount of the specified amount if the criteria of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) have been met, even though the actual unpaid balance after the
 advance or at any other time is less than the bona fide principal amount of the specified amount.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c), the amount of the line of credit of an unsecured open-end loan shall be the criterion to determine whether an unsecured open-end loan is of a bona fide principal amount or more specified in any section in this division.

(e) For the purposes of determining whether the loan amount exceeds a regulatory ceiling, the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 22251 shall apply to open-end loans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 347, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Disclosure of Loan Applications [22470. - 22470.]

22470.

(a) (1) Upon the request of a person who has obtained a police report pursuant to Section 530.6 of the Penal Code, a finance lender engaged in the business of making consumer loans shall provide to the person, or to a law enforcement officer specified by the person, copies of all application forms or application information containing the person’s name, address, or other identifying information pertaining to the application filed with the finance lender by an unauthorized person in violation of Section 530.5 of the
 Penal Code.

(2) Before providing copies pursuant to paragraph (1), the finance lender shall inform the requesting person of the categories of identifying information that the unauthorized person used to complete the application, and shall require the requesting person to provide identifying information in those categories and a copy of the police report.

(3) The finance lender shall provide copies of all forms and information required by this section, without charge, within 10 business days of receipt of the person’s request and submission of the required copy of the police report and identifying information.

(b) (1) Before a finance lender provides copies to a law enforcement officer pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the finance lender may require the requesting person to provide
 them with a signed and dated statement by which the person does all of the following:

(A) Authorizes disclosure for a stated period.

(B) Specifies the name of the agency or department to which the disclosure is authorized.

(C) Identifies the type of records that the person authorizes to be disclosed.

(2) The finance lender shall include in the statement to be signed by the requesting person a notice that the person has the right at any time to revoke the authorization.

(c) As used in this section, “law enforcement officer” means a peace officer as defined by Section 830.1 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 493, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Commercial Loans [22500. - 22650.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [22500. - 22502.]

22500.

“Charges” include the aggregate interest, fees, bonuses, commissions, brokerage, discounts, expenses, and other forms of costs charged, contracted for, or received by a licensee or any other person in connection with the investigating, arranging, negotiating, procuring, guaranteeing, making, servicing, collecting, and enforcing of a loan or forbearance of money, credit, goods, or things in action, or any other service rendered.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22501.

“Charges” do not include commissions received as a licensed insurance agent or broker.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22502.

“Commercial loan” means a loan of a principal amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more, or any loan under an open-end credit program, whether secured by either real or personal property, or both, or unsecured, the proceeds of which are intended by the borrower for use primarily for other than personal, family, or household purposes.

For purposes of determining whether a loan is a commercial loan, the lender may rely on any written statement of intended purposes signed by the borrower. The statement may be a
 separate statement signed by the borrower or may be contained in a loan application or other document signed by the borrower. The lender shall not be required to ascertain that the proceeds of the loan are used in accordance with the statement of intended purposes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exemptions [22550. - 22552.]

22550.

Sections 22152, 22154, 22155, 22163, and 22164 do not apply to any commercial loan of a bona fide principal amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more, or to a duly licensed finance lender in connection with any such loan or loans, if the provisions of this section are not used for the purpose of evading this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22551.

In determining whether a loan is a loan of a bona fide principal amount of the specified amount or more, the following principles shall apply:

(a) If a borrower applies for a loan in a bona fide principal amount of less than the specified amount and a loan to that borrower of a bona fide principal amount of the specified amount or more is made by a licensed finance lender, no adequate economic reason for the increase in the size of the loan exists, and by prearrangement or understanding between
 the borrower and the licensee a substantial payment is to be made upon the loan with the effect of reducing the bona fide principal amount of the loan to less than the specified amount within a short time after the making of the loan other than by reason of a requirement that the loan be paid in substantially equal periodical installments, then the loan shall not be deemed to be a loan of the bona fide principal amount of the specified amount or more.

(b) A subsequent advance of money of less than a bona fide principal amount of the specified amount pursuant to a revolving or open-end loan agreement or similar agreement between a borrower and a licensed finance lender which gives the borrower the right to draw upon all or any part of the line of credit, or a loan agreement providing for the making of advances to the borrower from time to time up to an aggregate maximum amount which gives the borrower the right to draw all or any part of the
 total amount, shall be deemed to be a loan of a bona fide principal amount of the specified amount or more if the line of credit or the aggregate maximum amount is a bona fide principal amount of the specified amount or more and the initial advance was a bona fide principal amount of the specified amount or more even though the actual unpaid balance after the advance or at any other time is less than a bona fide principal amount of the specified amount.

(c) If a loan made by a licensed finance lender has a bona fide principal amount of the specified amount or more, the fact that the transaction is in the form of a sale of accounts, chattel paper, goods, or instruments, or a lease of goods, or in the form of an advance on the purchase price of any of the foregoing, shall not be deemed to affect the bona fides of the amount thereof.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “the
 specified amount” means five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(e) For the purposes of determining whether the loan amount exceeds a regulatory ceiling, the “bona fide principal amount” shall not be comprised of any charges or any other fees or recompense specified in Sections 22500, 22501, and 22601. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prevent those specified charges, fees, and recompense that have been earned and remain unpaid in an existing loan from being considered as part of the bona fide principal amount of a new loan to refinance that existing loan, provided the new loan is not made for the purpose of circumventing a regulatory ceiling provision. This subdivision is intended to define the meaning of “bona fide principal amount” as used in this division solely for the purposes of determining whether the loan amount exceeds a regulatory ceiling, and is not intended to affect the meaning of “principal” for any other
 purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 347, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22552.

This chapter does not apply to a program administrator or a PACE solicitor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 70.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Loan Regulations [22600. - 22604.]

22600.

(a) A licensee may sell promissory notes evidencing the obligation to repay loans made by the licensee pursuant to this division or evidencing the obligation to repay loans purchased from and made by another licensee pursuant to this division to institutional investors, and may make agreements with institutional investors for the collection of payments or the performance of services with respect to those notes.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “institutional investor”
 means the following:

(1) The United States or any state, district, territory, or commonwealth thereof, or any city, county, city and county, public district, public authority, public corporation, public entity, or political subdivision of a state, district, territory, or commonwealth of the United States, or any agency or other instrumentality of any one or more of the foregoing.

(2) Any bank, trust company, savings bank or savings and loan association, credit union, industrial bank or industrial loan company, finance lender, or insurance company doing business under the authority of and in accordance with a license, certificate, or charter issued by the United States or any state, district, territory, or commonwealth of the United States.

(3) Trustees of pension, profit sharing, or welfare funds, if the pension,
 profit sharing, or welfare fund has a net worth of not less than fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), except pension, profit sharing, or welfare funds of a licensee or its affiliate, self-employed individual retirement plans, or individual retirement accounts.

(4) Any corporation with outstanding securities registered under Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or any wholly owned subsidiary of that corporation; provided, however, that the purchaser represents that it is purchasing for its own account for investment and not with a view to or for sale in connection with any distribution of the promissory note.

(5) Any syndication or other combination of any of the foregoing that is organized to purchase the promissory note.

(6) A trust or other business entity established by an institutional investor for
 the purpose of issuing or facilitating the issuance of undivided interests in, the right to receive payments from, or that are payable primarily from, a pool of financial assets held by the trust or business entity if all of the following apply:

(A) The business entity is not a sole proprietorship.

(B) The pool of assets consists of one or more of the following:

(i) Interest bearing obligations.

(ii) Other contractual obligations representing the right to receive payments from the assets.

(iii) Surety bonds, insurance policies, letters of credit, or other instruments providing credit enhancements for these assets.

(C) The
 interests will be either of the following:

(i) Rated investment grade by Standard & Poor’s Corporation or Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. “Investment grade” means that the securities will be rated by Standard & Poor’s Corporation as AAA, AA, A, or BBB, or by Moody’s Investor Service, Inc., as Aaa, Aa, A, or Baa, including a rating with a “+” or “–” designation or other variations that occur within these ratings.

(ii) Sold to an institutional investor as otherwise defined in this section.

(D) The offer and sale of the securities is qualified under the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 (Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code) or is registered under federal securities laws, or is exempt from qualification or registration.

(c) In the absence of agreement to the contrary by the licensee and the institutional investor, all payments received from the collection of payments shall be deposited and maintained in a trust account, and shall be disbursed from the trust account only in accordance with the instructions of the owner of the promissory note.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 672, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22600.1.

(a) A licensee that is a finance lender may sell to (1) an institutional lender, or (2) an institutional investor described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 22600, promissory notes evidencing the obligation to repay real estate secured business purpose loans, as defined in Section 3500.5 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, purchased from and made by an institutional lender, and may make agreements for the collection of payments and performance of services with respect to those notes. For purposes of this
 section, “institutional lender” means any bank, trust company, savings bank or savings and loan association, credit union, or industrial loan company doing business under the authority of and in accordance with a license, certificate or charter issued by the United States or this state.

(b) In the absence of agreement to the contrary by the licensee and the institutional investor or institutional lender, all payments received from the collection of payments shall be deposited and maintained in a trust account, and shall be disbursed from the trust account only in accordance with the instructions of the owner of the promissory note.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 428, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22601.

With respect to a loan under this division, a fee not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15) for the return by a depository institution of a dishonored check, negotiable order of withdrawal, or share draft may be charged and collected by the licensee. The fee is not included in charges as defined in this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22602.

(a) A licensee that is a finance lender may pay compensation to a person that is not licensed pursuant to this division in connection with the referral of one or more prospective borrowers to the licensee, when all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The referral by the unlicensed person leads to the consummation of a commercial loan, as defined in Section 22502, between the licensee and the prospective borrower referred by the unlicensed person.

(2) The loan contract provides for an annual percentage rate that does not exceed 36 percent.

(3) Before approving the loan, the licensee does both of the following:

(A) Obtains documentation from the prospective borrower documenting the borrower’s commercial status. Examples of acceptable forms of documentation include, but are not limited to, a seller’s permit, business license, articles of incorporation, income tax returns showing business income, or bank account statements showing business income.

(B) Performs underwriting and obtains documentation to ensure that the prospective borrower will have sufficient monthly gross revenue with which to repay the loan pursuant to the loan terms, and does not make a loan if it determines through its underwriting that the prospective borrower’s total monthly expenses, including debt service payments on the loan for
 which the prospective borrower is being considered, will exceed the prospective borrower’s monthly gross revenue. Examples of acceptable forms of documentation for verifying current and projected gross monthly revenue and monthly expenses include, but are not limited to, tax returns, bank statements, merchant financial statements, business plans, business history, and industry-specific knowledge and experience. If the prospective borrower is a sole proprietor or a corporation and the loan will be secured by a personal guarantee provided by the owner of the corporation, a credit report from at least one consumer credit reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis shall also be considered.

(4) The licensee maintains records of all compensation paid to unlicensed persons in connection with the
 referral of borrowers for a period of at least four years.

(5) The licensee annually submits information requested by the commissioner regarding the payment of compensation in the report required pursuant to Section 22159. 

(b) A licensee that pays compensation to a person that is not licensed pursuant to this division in connection with a referral for a commercial loan made by